Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-264
Common carrier; provide information to consumers.

The common carrier providing intrastate transmission for pay-per-call services shall provide to consumers upon request the name, address, and customer service telephone number of any information provider to whom the common carrier provides such transmission service, either directly or through another entity such as a service bureau. The common carrier shall provide the information at no charge and within a reasonable time upon verbal or written request.

Laws 1993, LB 42, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1105;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 126.